Maryland, session 2025, HB0102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
8.3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ANCHOR DATE” MEANS THE EARLIER OF THE DATE ON WHICH:
(1) AN APPLICATION FOR BENEFITS IS COMPLETE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 8.3–701(B)(2) OF THIS TITLE; OR
(2) LEAVE BEGINS FOR A COVERED INDIVIDUAL FOR WHICH BENEFITS
MAY BE PAID UNDER THIS TITLE.
(b) “Application year” means the 12–month period beginning on the Sunday of
the calendar week [for which benefits are approved] IN WHICH LEAVE UNDER THIS TITLE
BEGINS.
(d) “Covered employee” means an employee who has worked at least 680 hours
performing services under employment located in the State over the four most recently
completed calendar quarters for which quarterly reports have been required immediately
preceding the date on which leave is to begin ANCHOR DATE.
(e) “Covered individual” means a covered employee or a self–employed individual
who elects to participate in the Program under § 8.3–201 of this title.
8.3–201.
(a) In this section, “self–employed individual” includes an individual [that] WHO:
(1) is the sole owner of a sole proprietorship, limited liability company, C
corporation, or S corporation; and
(2) is the only individual employed by the sole proprietorship, limited
liability company, C corporation, or S corporation.
(b) [(1)] A self–employed individual who is a resident of the State may elect to
participate in the Program [by filing a written notice of election with the Secretary] in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Secretary UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 363
[(2) An election made under paragraph (1) of this subsection becomes
effective on the date the written notice is filed.
(c) (1) If a self–employed individual elects to participate in the Program under
subsection (b) of this section, the individual shall participate for an initial period of not less
than 3 years.
(2) Once the initial participation period expires, the self–employed
individual may renew participation in the Program for a period of not less than 1 year.
(3) If the self–employed individual does not wish to renew participation in
the Program under paragraph (2) of this subsection, within 30 days before the participation
period expires, the self–employed individual shall notify the Secretary in writing of the
self–employed individual’s withdrawal from the Program.
(d) During the period a self–employed individual participates in the Program, the
self–employed individual shall pay the contribution required under § 8.3–601 of this title.]
(C) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027 2028, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH AN OPTIONAL SELF–EMPLOYED ENROLLMENT
PROGRAM AND INCLUDE:
(1) CONTRIBUTION AMOUNTS;
(2) BENEFIT AMOUNTS; AND
(3) ENROLLMENT PROCEDURES.
8.3–406.
(a) On or before [November 15] OCTOBER 1 each year, the Secretary shall
submit to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
the General Assembly an annual report on the administration and operation of the Program
during the immediately preceding fiscal year.
8.3–601.
(a) (1) (I) Beginning July 1, 2025 JANUARY 1, 2027, each employee of an
employer[,] AND each employer with 15 or more employees[, and each self–employed
individual participating in the Program] shall contribute to the Fund.
[(2)] (II) The total rate of contribution established under this section FOR
EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYERS DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH:
– 3 –

Ch. 363 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(i)] 1. may not exceed 1.2% of an employee’s wages; and
[(ii)] 2. shall be applied to all wages up to and including the Social
Security wage base.
(2) EACH SELF–EMPLOYED INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM SHALL CONTRIBUTE TO THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER § 8.3–201(C) OF THIS TITLE.
(b) (1) Subject to subsection [(a)(2)] (A)(1)(II) of this section, on or before
February 1, 2025 MAY 1, 2026, the Secretary shall set the total rate of contribution based
on available cost analyses of the Program.
(2) The rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be in effect for
the period from July 1, 2025 JANUARY 1, 2027, to June 30, 2026 DECEMBER 31, 2027,
both inclusive.
(c) (1) On or before November 15 OCTOBER 1 each year, beginning in 2026
2027, the Secretary shall conduct a cost analysis of the Program that is focused on the cost
of maintaining solvency and paying benefits to covered individuals that will be used to
determine the appropriate total rate of contribution to the Fund.
(2) On or before November 15 OCTOBER 1 each year, the Secretary shall
report the results of the cost analysis to the Senate Finance Committee, the House
Economic Matters Committee, and the Joint Committee on Administrative, Executive, and
Legislative Review in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection and subsection [(a)(2)]
(A)(1)(II) of this section, on or before February NOVEMBER 1 each year, beginning in 2026
2027, the Secretary shall set the total rate of contribution that will be in effect for the
12–month period beginning on the immediately following July JANUARY 1.
(2) The rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be based on
the cost analysis required under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) (1) (i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each employer of 15
or more employees shall contribute an amount equal to 50% of the total rate of contribution
for each employee.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each employee of an
employer shall contribute an amount equal to 50% of the total rate of contribution.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
employer of the employee shall deduct the employee’s required contribution from the wages
of the employee.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 363
(ii) 1. An employer may elect to pay all or a portion of the
required employee contributions in whole or in part.
2. If the employer of an employee elects to pay a portion of
the employee’s required contribution, the employer:
A. may deduct an amount that is less than 50% of the rate of
contribution required from the wages of the employee; and
B. shall notify employees of the rate of contribution set for
employees under subsection (d)(1) of this section and the portion of that amount that the
employer is electing to pay.
[(f) Each self–employed individual participating in the Program shall:
(1) pay contributions during each year that the self–employed individual
participates in the Program; and
(2) contribute an amount equal to the total rate of contribution set under
subsection (d) of this section.]
[(g)] (F) (1) The Maryland Department of Health shall reimburse each:
(i) community provider that is required to be licensed or certified
under Title 7 of the Health – General Article for 100% of the employer contribution required
under subsection (e) of this section for employees who manage or provide services under
Title 7 of the Health – General Article;
(ii) community provider that is required to be licensed or certified
under Title 7.5 of the Health – General Article for a percentage of the employer contribution
required under subsection (e) of this section for employees who manage or provide services
under Title 7.5 of the Health – General Article that is equal to the percentage of revenue
that is attributable to federal and State Medicaid funding and any other State funding
received by the community provider for the services during the period covered by the
reimbursement; or
(iii) provider, as defined in § 16–201.4 of the Health – General Article,
for a percentage of the employer contribution required under subsection (e) of this section
for employees who manage or provide services described in § 16–201.4(a) of the
Health – General Article that is equal to the percentage of revenue attributable to federal
and State Medicaid funding and any other State funding received by the provider for the
services during the period covered by the reimbursement.
(2) The Maryland Department of Health shall make the reimbursements
required under paragraph (1) of this subsection at least quarterly.
– 5 –

Ch. 363 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) To receive reimbursement under paragraph (1) of this subsection, a
provider shall provide to the Maryland Department of Health any information necessary to
carry out this subsection in the form and manner required by the Maryland Department of
Health.
8.3–701.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, beginning [July 1, 2026] ON
A DATE NOT EARLIER THAN JANUARY 1, 2027, BUT NOT LATER THAN JANUARY 3,
2028, DETERMINED AND ANNOUNCED BY THE SECRETARY, a covered individual taking
leave from employment may submit a claim for benefits:
(i) 1. to care for a newborn child of the covered individual during
the first year after the child’s birth; or
2. because a child is being placed for adoption, foster care, or
kinship care with the covered individual or to care for or bond with the child during the
first year after the placement;
(ii) to care for a family member with a serious health condition;
(iii) to attend to a serious health condition that results in the covered
individual being unable to perform the functions of the covered individual’s position;
(iv) to care for a service member with a serious health condition
resulting from military service for whom the covered individual is next of kin; or
(v) to attend to a qualifying exigency arising out of the deployment
of a service member who is a family member of the covered individual.
8.3–703.
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage shall be
calculated as the total wages received by the covered [individual] EMPLOYEE in the
highest of the previous four completed calendar quarters THAT IMMEDIATELY PRECEDE
THE ANCHOR DATE AND for which quarterly reports have been required, divided by 13;
and
(2) the State average weekly wage shall be the wage calculated under §
9–603 of this article.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 363
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the weekly benefit
amount payable to a covered [individual] EMPLOYEE under this title shall be:
(i) if the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage
is 65% or less of the State average weekly wage, 90% of the covered [individual’s]
EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage; or
(ii) if the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage
is greater than 65% of the State average weekly wage, the sum of:
1. 90% of the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average
weekly wage up to 65% of the State average weekly wage; and
2. 50% of the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average
weekly wage that is greater than 65% of the State average weekly wage.
(2) The benefit paid under this title and any additional paid leave cannot
total more than 100% of the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage.
(3) The weekly benefit amount payable under paragraph (1) of this
subsection:
(i) shall be at least $50; and
(ii) may not exceed:
1. for the 6–month period beginning July 1, 2026, PERIOD
BEGINNING ON THE DATE ANNOUNCED BY THE SECRETARY UNDER § 8.3–701(A)(1)
OF THIS SUBTITLE AND ENDING DECEMBER 31, 2028, BOTH INCLUSIVE, $1,000; and
2. for the 12–month period beginning January 1, 2027 2029,
and each subsequent 12–month period, the amount determined and announced by the
Secretary under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(4) (i) In this paragraph, “Consumer Price Index” means the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Washington–Arlington–Alexandria,
DC–VA–MD–WV metropolitan area or a successor index published by the federal Bureau
of Labor Statistics.
(ii) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, for the 12–month period
beginning January 1, [2027] 2029, and each subsequent 12–month period, the maximum
weekly benefit amount shall be increased by the amount, rounded to the nearest cent, that
equals the product of:
– 7 –

Ch. 363 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. the maximum weekly benefit amount in effect for the
immediately preceding 12–month period; and
2. the annual percentage growth in the Consumer Price
Index for the immediately preceding 12–month period, as determined by the Secretary
under subparagraph (iii)1 of this paragraph.
(iii) Beginning September 1, [2026] 2028, and on each subsequent
September 1, the Secretary shall determine and announce:
1. the annual percentage growth, if any, in the Consumer
Price Index based on the most recent 12–month period for which data are available on
September 1; and
2. the maximum weekly benefit amount effective for the
12–month period beginning the immediately following January 1.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an increase in
the weekly benefit amount under subsection (b)(4) of this section applies only to [a claim
for benefits that begins] AN APPLICATION YEAR WITH AN ANCHOR DATE THAT OCCURS
ON OR after the date the increase becomes effective.
(2) If the leave for which benefits are being paid is being taken
intermittently, an increase in the weekly benefit amount shall apply to a claim for benefits
as specified in regulations adopted by the Department.
(d) The Department shall:
(5) make subsequent payments AT LEAST every 2 weeks until the benefit
period ends.
(e) (2) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, on or before September 1
each year, beginning in [2026] 2028, the Board shall determine whether the seasonally
adjusted total employment from the Current Employment Statistics series as reported by
the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics for the most recent 6–month period is negative as
compared with the immediately preceding 6–month period.
(f) The Department shall [notify each employer of] ANNOUNCE the increase to
the maximum weekly benefit specified under subsection (b)(3)(ii) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Labor may not require employers who are allowed to pool together with other employers
under § 19–602 of the Insurance Article to purchase insurance to escrow employer and
employee contributions under § 8.3–601 of the Labor and Employment Article before the
issuance of Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program benefits by the Department.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 363
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 9 –